Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1294.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4(d) and (e) of the act of May 29, 1956 (1955 P.L.1804, No.600), referred to as the Municipal Police Pension Law, are amended to read:Section 4. * * *(d) Whenever two or more boroughs, cities, towns or townships establish a regional police department through an intermunicipal agreement [under the act of July 12, 1972 (P.L.762, No.180), referred to as the Intergovernmental 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 Cooperation Law] in accordance with 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 23 Subch. A (relating to intergovernmental cooperation), the participating boroughs, cities, towns or townships shall individually adopt ordinances establishing the regional police pension fund which shall have a uniform benefit structure consistent with this act. Any member of the police force of any of the boroughs, cities, towns or townships establishing the regional police department, or any member of the police force of any of the boroughs, cities, towns or townships joining a previously established regional police department, who is appointed as a member of the regional police force [within six months of its establishment shall have credited to his employment record for pension or retirement benefit purposes all of the time spent by him as a full-time member of the police pension fund of the municipality. Prior to the adoption of the pension plan for the regional police department, the municipalities shall obtain an actuarial valuation report on the proposed pension plan. The actuarial valuation report shall be prepared under Chapter 2 of the act of December 18, 1984 (P.L.1005, No.205), known as the "Municipal Pension Plan Funding Standard and Recovery Act."] within six months of its establishment or within six months of the subsequent joinder of a participating municipality, as applicable, shall have credited to his employment record for pension or retirement benefit purposes all of the time spent by him as a full-time member of the police pension fund of the municipality. If authorized in the intermunicipal agreement, a participating municipality may transfer a combination of assets or liabilities of its municipal police pension fund to the regional police pension fund, and the regional police pension fund shall become responsible for the transferred assets or 20250HB1294PN1474 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 liabilities. Prior to the adoption of the pension plan for the regional police department or the subsequent assumption of additional assets or liabilities by the regional police pension fund in accordance with this subsection, the participating municipalities shall obtain an actuarial valuation report on the proposed pension plan. The actuarial valuation report shall be prepared under Chapter 2 of the act of December 18, 1984 (P.L.1005, No.205), known as the "Municipal Pension Plan Funding Standard and Recovery Act."(e) If a borough, town or township disbands its police force or regional police department and enters into an intermunicipal agreement with another borough, town or township for the provision of police services [under the Intergovernmental Cooperation Law] in accordance with 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 23 Subch. A, including joining an existing regional police department, the intermunicipal agreement may provide for the transfer of service credits for any active member of the disbanded police force or regional police department who is employed on or after January 1, 1995, as a member of the police force or regional police department providing police services to the borough, town or township that disbanded its police force or regional police department, provided that the member is employed within six months of the effective date of the disbandment. If authorized in an intermunicipal agreement, the service credits transferred for each eligible member shall be equal to the total time spent by the member as a full-time member of the disbanded police force. The intermunicipal agreement providing for the transfer of service credits may provide for the transfer of all assets from the police pension fund of the disbanded police force or regional police department to the police pension fund of the 20250HB1294PN1474 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 police force or regional police department of the borough, town or township providing the police services[, provided that the amount of the assets transferred does not exceed the actuarial accrued liability of the transferred members as calculated by the actuary of the police pension fund of the police force of the borough, town or township providing the police services. The actuarial valuation prepared by the actuary shall be prepared under Chapter 2 of the "Municipal Pension Plan Funding Standard and Recovery Act."]. The transfer of all assets from the police pension fund of the disbanded police force or regional police department to the police pension fund of the police force or regional police department of the borough, town or township providing the police services must occur no later than one year from the date of disbandment. If all assets are not transferred within one year from the date of disbandment, the borough, town or township shall transfer the assets to the Commonwealth in a manner determined by the State Treasurer. A borough, town or township that retains the assets from a police pension fund of a disbanded police force or regional police department after one year from the date of disbandment shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed ten per centum of the total aggregate of assets retained. The Office of Attorney General may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover the penalty specified under this subsection.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1294PN1474 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526